Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3631
First purchaser deduct fee; maintain records; public information; quarterly statement.

(1)(a) The first purchaser, at the time of settlement, shall deduct the corn fee and shall maintain the necessary record of the fee for each purchase of corn on the grain settlement form or check stub showing payment to the grower for each purchase. Such records maintained by the first purchaser shall provide the following information:

(i) Name and address of the grower and seller;

(ii) The date of the purchase;

(iii) The number of bushels of corn sold; and

(iv) The amount of fees collected on each purchase.

(b) Such records shall be open for inspection during the normal business hours observed by the first purchaser.

(2) The first purchaser shall render and have on file with the board by the last day of each January, April, July, and October, on forms prescribed by the board, a statement of the number of bushels of corn purchased in Nebraska. At the time the statement is filed, the first purchaser shall pay and remit to the board the fee as provided for in section 2-3623.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 31;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 15.